Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1717
Support order,
defined.

Support order shall mean any order, decree,
or judgment for child, spousal, or medical support or for payment of any arrearage
for such support issued by a court or agency of competent jurisdiction, whether
issued prior to, on, or after November 16, 1985, whether for temporary or
permanent support, whether interlocutory or final, whether or not modifiable,
and whether or not incidental to a proceeding for dissolution of marriage,
judicial or legal separation, separate maintenance, paternity, guardianship,
or civil protection or any other action. A
support order may include payment for any monetary judgment.

Laws 1985, Second Spec. Sess., LB 7, § 37;

Laws 1991, LB 457, § 25;

Laws 2010, LB712, § 31.